North Carolina, session 2025, HB782.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-79.4(b)(44) reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-79.4. Special registration plates.
…
(b) Types. – The Division shall issue the following types of special registration plates:
…
(44) Civic Club. – Issuable to a member of a nationally recognized civic
organization whose member clubs in the State are exempt from State corporate
income tax under G.S. 105-130.11(a)(5). For purposes of this subdivision, "a
member" includes the organization itself if the organization is the registered
owner of the vehicle. Examples of these clubs include Jaycees, Kiwanis,
Optimist, Lions Club, Rotary, Ruritan, and Shrine. The plate shall bear a word
or phrase identifying the civic club and the emblem of the civic club. A person
may obtain from the Division a special registration plate under this
subdivision for the registered owner of a motor vehicle or a motorcycle. The
registration fees and the restrictions on the issuance of a specialized
registration plate for a motorcycle are the same as for any motor vehicle. The
Division may not issue a civic club plate authorized by this subdivision unless
it receives at least 300 applications for that civic club plate."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H782-v-1*